tests/gerunds.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../ba-tt.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../tt-ba.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "[twol] general gerund phonology":
    бар<v><iv><ger><nom> : бару
    бир<v><tv><ger><nom> : бирү
    сөйлә<v><tv><ger><nom> : сөйләү
    кара<v><tv><ger><nom> : карау
    буя<v><tv><ger><nom> : буяу
    төя<v><tv><ger><nom> : төяү
    укы<v><tv><ger><nom> : уку
    төзе<v><tv><ger><nom> : төзү
    бае<v><tv><ger><nom> : баю
    бие<v><tv><ger><nom> : бию

  "[twol] general gerund phonology and orthography with px3":
    бар<v><iv><ger><px3sp><nom> : баруы
    бир<v><tv><ger><px3sp><nom> : бирүе
    сөйлә<v><tv><ger><px3sp><nom> : сөйләве
    кара<v><tv><ger><px3sp><nom> : каравы
    буя<v><tv><ger><px3sp><nom> : буявы
    төя<v><tv><ger><px3sp><nom> : төяве
    укы<v><tv><ger><px3sp><nom> : укуы
    төзе<v><tv><ger><px3sp><nom> : төзүе
    бае<v><tv><ger><px3sp><nom> : баюы
    бие<v><tv><ger><px3sp><nom> : биюе
